Utah statutes.
77-17-11.   Jury to retire for deliberation -- Oath of officer having
custody.
After hearing the court's instructions and arguments of counsel, the jury
shall retire for deliberation. An officer shall be sworn to keep them together
in some private and convenient place and not permit any person to speak to or
communicate with them or to do so himself except upon the order of the court,
or to ask them whether they have agreed on a verdict. He shall return them to
court when they have agreed and the court has so ordered, or when otherwise
ordered by the court.
